Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.103, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 307, O.S.L. 2025 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 34.103), is amended to read as follows:


Section 34.103. A. In addition to any other duties prescribed


by law, at the meeting required by Section 23 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution to be held in February of 2017, and at the


February meeting of the State Board of Equalization each year


thereafter, the State Board of Equalization shall certify:



Req. No. 2752 Page 1


1. For the revenue derived from the tax levied on oil pursuant


to Section 1001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which would


otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the average


annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General Revenue


Fund for the immediately preceding five (5) complete fiscal years.


For any year after the first year during which a deposit to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the


Revenue Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time;


2. For the revenue derived from the tax levied on natural gas


pursuant to Section 1001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, which


would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the


average annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the previous five (5) fiscal years. For any year


after the first year during which a deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time; and


3. For the revenue derived from the corporate income tax levied


pursuant to Section 2355 of Title 68 the Oklahoma Statutes, which

Req. No. 2752 Page 2


would otherwise be apportioned to the General Revenue Fund, the


average annual amount of actual revenue apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the previous five (5) fiscal years. For any year


after the first year during which a deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund is made, the amount of any deposit to the Revenue


Stabilization Fund shall be disregarded for purposes of this


paragraph and the average shall be computed using the total amount


of revenue that was available to be apportioned to the General


Revenue Fund for the applicable period of time.


B. If the amount of revenue available for apportionment to the


General Revenue Fund for the next ensuing fiscal year exceeds the


amounts certified pursuant to paragraph 1 or 2 of subsection A of


this section, with respect to each such revenue source, one hundred


percent (100%) of such amount in excess of the separately computed


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the


Revenue Stabilization Fund.


C. If the amount of revenue available for apportionment to the


General Revenue Fund for the next ensuing fiscal year exceeds the


amount certified pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection A of this


section:


1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of such amount in excess of the


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the

Req. No. 2752 Page 3


Constitutional Reserve Fund unless such deposit would exceed the


maximum balance permitted pursuant to Section 23 of Article X of the


Oklahoma Constitution and in such case the amount in excess of the


maximum balance shall be deposited to the credit of the Revenue


Stabilization Fund; and


2. Seventy-five percent (75%) of such amount in excess of the


five-year average, which would otherwise be apportioned to the


General Revenue Fund, shall be deposited to the credit of the


Revenue Stabilization Fund, together with any amount required for


deposit pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this


subsection.


D. 1. As used in this subsection and as used in subsection D


of Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes:


a. “base year total collections” means the amount of


revenue certified by the State Board of Equalization


at its December meeting and includes all revenue


sources reported in the annual report of the Oklahoma


Tax Commission excluding any tax collected by the


Commission from levies imposed by counties, cities,


towns or any other entity of local government, which


for purposes of implementation of any income tax rate


reductions otherwise authorized by this act shall be


the highest preceding total collections amount as


defined by subparagraph b of this paragraph. For

Req. No. 2752 Page 4


purposes of reporting total collections for purposes


of this subsection, the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


use the same methodology used to report estimated


revenues to the State Board of Equalization that was


used to make the report for the December 2024 meeting,


b. “highest preceding total collections” means the


largest amount of revenue reported for any single


fiscal year prior to the immediately preceding full


fiscal year, determined by the State Board of


Equalization at its December meeting and including all


revenue sources reported in the annual report of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission excluding any tax collected by


the Commission from levies imposed by counties,


cities, towns or any other entity of local government.


For purposes of reporting total collections for


purposes of this subsection, the Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall use the same methodology used to


report estimated revenues to the State Board of


Equalization that was used to make the report for the


December 2024 meeting,


c. “income tax rate reduction threshold” means the amount


of revenue determined by the Oklahoma Tax Commission


for twelve (12) months comprising a single tax year


predicted to be foregone as a result of any reduction

Req. No. 2752 Page 5


in income tax rates pursuant to the provisions of this


act, including the provisions of subsection D of


Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes


multiplied by the number one and twenty-five


hundredths (1.25). The income tax rate reduction cost


threshold shall not be less than the amount of revenue


loss attributable to a reduction in the income tax


rates for the previous fiscal year and shall not be


greater than such revenue loss for the previous fiscal


year multiplied by the number one and twenty-five


hundredths (1.25), and


d. “comparison year total collections” means the amount


of revenue determined by the State Board of


Equalization at its December meeting for the


immediately preceding fiscal year and includes all


revenue sources reported in the annual report of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission excluding any tax collected by


the Commission from levies imposed by counties,


cities, towns or any other entity of local government.


For purposes of reporting total collections for


purposes of this subsection, the Oklahoma Tax


Commission shall use the same methodology used to


report estimated revenues to the State Board of



Req. No. 2752 Page 6


Equalization that was used to make the report for the


December 2024 meeting.


2. In addition to any other duties prescribed by law, at the


meeting required by Section 23 of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution to be held in December of 2026, and at the December


meeting of the State Board of Equalization each year thereafter, the


State Board of Equalization shall make a preliminary certification:


a. and report the base year total collections, the income


tax rate reduction threshold, and the comparison year


total collections,


b. if the comparison year total collections amount


exceeds the base year total collections amount plus


the income tax reduction cost threshold, the tax rates


otherwise prescribed pursuant to subsection D of


Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall be reduced according to the provisions of


Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


any reduction in such rates shall become effective on


the January 1 date following the final February


certification by the State Board of Equalization that


an income tax rate reduction is authorized by the


provisions of this act, and


c. with respect to all subsequent meetings of the Board,


the Board shall make a preliminary finding at its

Req. No. 2752 Page 7


December meeting each year and, if the requirements of


this act are fulfilled, the State Board shall make a


final determination at its February meeting each year


whether the comparison year total collections exceeds


the base year total collections plus the income tax


reduction cost threshold, and a reduction in the


income tax rates otherwise prescribed pursuant to


paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection D of Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be implemented


and any reduction in such rates shall become effective


on the January 1 date following the final February


certification by the State Board of Equalization that


an income tax rate reduction is authorized by the


provisions of this act.


3. In addition to any other requirements of this act for the


implementation of a reduction of individual income tax rates


pursuant to this subsection and pursuant to subsection E of Section


2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, at the State Board of


Equalization meeting to be held in December 2026, the State Board


must certify that the revenues accruing to certified funds during


the first five and one-half (5 1/2) months of fiscal year ending


June 30, 2027, were within ninety-five percent (95%) of the estimate


made in February 2026, and no revenue failure was declared.



Req. No. 2752 Page 8


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 307, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2355), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:


1. METHOD 1.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and

Req. No. 2752 Page 9


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, not


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.

Req. No. 2752 Page 10


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 2752 Page 11


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


2355.1F and 2355.1G of this title is made by the State Board of


Equalization, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,



Req. No. 2752 Page 12


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and

Req. No. 2752 Page 13


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


C. Individuals. For tax years 2024 and 2025, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 2752 Page 14


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


D. Individuals. For tax year 2026 and for subsequent tax years


subject to rate reductions as provided by subsection E of this


section, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of


every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall be


computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0% tax on first $3,750.00 or part thereof,


(b) 2.5% tax on the next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(c) 3.5% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 4.5% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0% tax on first $7,500.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 2752 Page 15


(b) 2.5% tax on the next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(c) 3.5% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(d) 4.5% tax on the remainder.


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


E. As provided by subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, if the comparison year total collections


exceeds the base year total collections plus the income tax rate


reduction threshold, as certified by the State Board of Equalization


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the tax rates otherwise prescribed in


paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection D of this section shall each be


reduced by twenty-five one-hundredths (0.25) of a percentage point


(0.0025) until the applicable rate equals zero percent (0%). Each


successive certification by the State Board of Equalization with


respect to which the comparison year total collections exceeds the


base year total collections plus the income tax rate reduction


threshold, as determined by the State Board of Equalization as


provided by subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, shall further reduce the individual income tax


rates by twenty-five one-hundredths (0.25) of a percentage point


(0.0025) until the applicable rate equals zero percent (0%). Any


reduction in the income tax rates authorized by this section and by


this act shall take effect on January 1 following the final

Req. No. 2752 Page 16


certification by the State Board of Equalization, if any, made


during its meeting in February each year.


F. If a revenue failure is declared pursuant to the provisions


of Section 34.49 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes prior to the


end of the calendar year in which the Board makes a certification


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, the reduction in tax rates, as


otherwise provided for in this section, shall not occur until a


subsequent certification is made by the State Board of Equalization


pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection D of Section 34.103 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


G. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of


eight percent (8%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to the


Oklahoma taxable income of such nonresident aliens as determined


under the provision of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


eight percent (8%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to

Req. No. 2752 Page 17


the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such


payment. Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission


shall prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to


deduct and withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total


amounts paid to each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such


payee, on or before January 31 of the succeeding year, a written


statement showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and


the payee’s Social Security account number, if any, the total amount


paid subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld


as tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


H. F. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every corporation doing business within this state or


deriving income from sources within this state in an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof.


There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended.


I. G. Certain foreign corporations. In lieu of the tax imposed


in the first paragraph of subsection G D of this section, for all

Req. No. 2752 Page 18


taxable years beginning after December 31, 2021, there shall be


imposed on foreign corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of four percent (4%) instead of


thirty percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, where such income is received from sources within this


state, in accordance with the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31 of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee’s


Social Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid


subject to taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax,


and such other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any


payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums

Req. No. 2752 Page 19


herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


J. H. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsections B through D of this section for single


individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a deduction for any


federal income tax paid.


K. I. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsections A


through D of this section, as applicable there is hereby imposed for


each taxable year on the taxable income of every individual, whose


taxable income for such taxable year does not exceed the ceiling


amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable to such taxable


year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission and which shall


be in such form as it determines appropriate. In the table so


prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on the basis of


the rates prescribed by subsections A through D of this section.


For purposes of this subsection, the term “ceiling amount” means,


with respect to any taxpayer, the amount determined by the Tax


Commission for the tax rate category in which such taxpayer falls.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2752 QD 12/28/2025 5:59:36 PM



Req. No. 2752 Page 20